test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ANG_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_ANG_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_ANG_STEM_2

     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigaangaa
     chíigang+V+INDIRECT+PAST: chíigaangaan
     chíigang+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: chíigaangaas
     chíigang+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: chíigaangaa.ang
     chíigang+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: chíigaang'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+CERTAIN+PAST: chíigaang'ahlanggan
     chíigang+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigaang'ahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: chíigaang'ahlans
     chíigang+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: chíigaangaa'ahlang
     chíigang+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: chíigaangaa'ahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: chíigaangaa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+REFLEXIVE: chíigaang'ahl
